Hawaii statutes.
[§353H-2.5] Offender reentry
office. There shall be established within the department of public safety
an offender reentry office to oversee the development and implementation of the
comprehensive offender reentry system.

The offender reentry office shall:

(1) Ensure that the present and future reentry needs
of persons committed to correctional facilities are being evaluated and met in
an effective and appropriate manner;

(2) Develop and implement risk needs assessment tools
to properly place offenders in programs and services;

(3) Match offenders to programs and services that
address risks and needs identified;

(4) Monitor and record progress made by offenders
while participating in prescribed programs and services;

(5) Identify and make recommendations to address
needs not addressed by programs and services;

(6) Provide training opportunities for department
staff and service providers in assessments and evidence-based practices;

(7) Work closely and collaborate with the community
service and work furlough programs located in the community correctional
centers and correctional facilities;

(8) Work closely and collaborate with the Hawaii
paroling authority; and

(9) Work closely and collaborate with community
partners such as organizations, businesses, and concerned citizens. [L 2012, c
76, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next